Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Chapter 6.1. Ohio River Basin Commission.

§§ 62.1-79.1,
62.1-79.2.

Repealed by Acts 2017, c. 128, cl. 1.

Editor’s note.

Former §

62.1-79.1

, which authorized participation by Commonwealth in Ohio River Basin Commission, derived from 1972, c. 294.

Former § 62.1-79.2, which provided for appointment, terms and expenses of member and alternate of Ohio River Basin Commission, derived from 1972, c. 294.

The numbers of §§

62.1-79.1

and 62.1-79.2

were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1972 act having assigned no numbers.